Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1101
Legislative
findings and intent.

(1) The Legislature finds
and declares that: (a) Early childhood education programs can assist children
in achieving their potential as citizens, workers, and human beings and can
strengthen families; (b) early childhood education has been proven to be a
sound public investment of funds not only in assuring productive, taxpaying
workers in the economy but also in avoidance of increasingly expensive social
costs for those who drop out as productive members of society; (c) the key
ingredient in an effective early childhood education program is a strong family
development and support component because the role of the parent is of critical
importance; (d) while all children can benefit from quality, developmentally
appropriate early childhood education experiences, such experiences are especially
important for at-risk infants and children; (e) current early childhood education
programs serve only a fraction of Nebraska's children and the quality of current
programs varies widely; (f) well-designed early childhood education programs
increase the likelihood that children who participate will enter school prepared
to achieve high standards; (g) effective early childhood education programs
require staff with knowledge about child growth, development, and learning
and family systems; and (h) both public and nonpublic programs which meet
recognized standards of quality can address the growth, development, and learning
needs of young children.

(2)(a) It
is the intent of the Legislature and the public policy of this state to encourage
schools and community-based organizations to work together to provide high-quality
early childhood education programs for infants and young children which include
family involvement, with the
goal of assuring that every family in Nebraska has access to such programs
for, at the minimum, the school year prior to the school year for which the
child will be eligible to attend kindergarten. The purposes of
sections 79-1101 to 79-1104.05 are to provide state assistance to selected
school districts, cooperatives of school districts, and educational service
units for early childhood education, to encourage coordination between public
and private service providers of early childhood education and child care
programs, and to provide state support for efforts to improve training opportunities
for staff in such programs.

(b) It is
the further intent of the Legislature that any additional funds appropriated
on or after January 1, 2014, for FY2014-15 for early childhood education grants
pursuant to section 79-1103 be used to assist schools and community-based
organizations in working together to expand the access to such high-quality
early childhood education programs for children for the school year prior
to the school year for which the child will be eligible to attend kindergarten
and that the unobligated balance of any such funds be reappropriated for such
purpose for FY2015-16 and FY2016-17.

(3)
For purposes of sections 79-1101 to 79-1104.05:

(a) Board of trustees means the Early Childhood Education
Endowment Board of Trustees;

(b) Early childhood education program means any prekindergarten
part-day or full-day program or in-home family support program with a stated
purpose of promoting social, emotional, intellectual, language, physical,
and aesthetic development and learning for children from birth to kindergarten-entrance
age and family development and support;

(c) Endowment agreement means an agreement between the State
Department of Education and an endowment provider entered into pursuant to
section 79-1104.01; and

(d) Endowment provider means an endowment that has met the
criteria described in section 79-1104.01 and that has entered into an endowment
agreement.

Laws 1990, LB 567, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3701;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 783;

Laws 2001, LB 759, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1256, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB967, § 19.

Provision of training for child development and early childhood education services, see section 43-2620.